Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1000.
do enact as follows:SB1000,11Section 1. 118.227 of the statutes is created to read:SB1000,2,32118.227 Prohibited agreements and references; immoral conduct. (1) 3Definitions. In this section:SB1000,2,64(a) “Education employer” means a school board, the governing board of a 5charter school, or governing body of a private school participating in a program 6under s. 115.7915, 118.60, or 119.23.SB1000,2,77(b) “Immoral conduct” has the meaning given in s. 115.31 (1) (c).SB1000,2,118(2) Prohibited agreements. Beginning on the effective date of this 9subsection .... [LRB inserts date], an education employer may not enter into an 10agreement, including an agreement for resignation or termination and a severance 11agreement, or other contract, or take any action that does any of the following:SB1000,2,1312(a) Has the effect of suppressing or destroying information relating to an 13investigation of alleged immoral conduct by a current or former employee.SB1000,2,1514(b) Affects the ability of the education employer or any of its employees to 15report suspected immoral conduct.SB1000,2,1916(c) Requires the education employer to expunge information about allegations 17or findings of immoral conduct from any documents maintained by the education 18employer, unless after investigation the allegations are found to be false or not 19substantiated.SB1000,3,620(3) References; immunity. An education employer who provides information 1about the conduct of a current or former employee, including information about 2allegations of immoral conduct, about a current or former employee, in response to 3a request for information from a prospective employer is immune from all civil 4liability that may result from providing the requested information. The immunity 5from civil liability provided under this subsection is in addition to and not in lieu of 6that provided under s. 895.487.SB1000,3,77